Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Article 3 Voluntary Acknowledgment of Parentage

15-8.1-301.
Acknowledgment of parentage.

The following individuals may sign an acknowledgment of parentage to establish parentage of a child:

An individual who gave birth to the child;

An individual who is the alleged genetic parent of the child;

An individual who is an intended parent of the child under §

15-8.1-703

; and

A presumed parent under article 4 of this chapter.

The acknowledgment shall be signed by both the individual who gave birth to the child and by the individual seeking to establish a parent-child relationship and shall be witnessed and signed by at least one other individual and shall contain the following provisions:

A statement that the child whose parentage is being acknowledged does not have a presumed parent other than the individual seeking to establish the parent-child relationship or has a presumed parent whose full name is stated and does not have another acknowledged, adjudicated or intended parent under articles 7 and 8 of this chapter other than the individual who gave birth to the child.

A statement that the signatories understand that the acknowledgment is the equivalent of an adjudication of parentage of the child and that a challenge to the acknowledgment is permitted only under limited circumstances and is barred two (2) years after the effective date of the acknowledgment unless there is another presumed parent or genetic parent who could not reasonably have known about the birth of the child and commences a proceeding under this section within two (2) years after learning of the child’s birth.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-302.
Acknowledgment of parentage void.

An acknowledgment of parentage shall be void if, at the time of signing:

An individual other than the individual seeking to establish parentage is a presumed parent, unless a denial of parentage in a signed record has been filed with the state registrar for vital records; or

An individual, other than the individual who gave birth, is an acknowledged or adjudicated parent, or an intended parent under article 7 or 8 of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-303.
Denial of parentage.

An individual presumed to be a parent or an alleged genetic parent may sign a denial of parentage only in the limited circumstances set forth in this section.

A denial of parentage shall be valid only if:

An acknowledgment of parentage by another individual has been filed pursuant to this chapter;

The denial is in a record and is witnessed and signed by at least one other individual; and

The presumed or alleged genetic parent executing the denial has not previously:

Acknowledged parentage, unless the previous acknowledgment has been rescinded pursuant to §

15-8.1-307

, or successfully challenged the acknowledgment pursuant to §

15-8.1-308

; or

Been adjudicated to be the parent of the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-304.
Conditions for acknowledgment or denial of parentage.

Completed forms for acknowledgment of parentage and denial of parentage shall be filed with the state registrar for vital records.

An acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage may be signed before or after the birth of a child.

An acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage takes effect on the date of the birth of the child or the filing of the document with the department of vital records, whichever occurs later.

An acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage signed by a minor shall be valid provided it is otherwise in compliance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-305.
Equivalent to adjudication, no ratification required.

Except as otherwise provided in §§

15-8.1-307

and

15-8.1-308

, a valid acknowledgment of parentage under §

15-8.1-301

, filed with the department of vital records, is equivalent to an adjudication of parentage of a child and confers upon the acknowledged parent all of the rights and duties of a parent.

Judicial or administrative ratification is neither permitted nor required for an unrescinded or unchallenged acknowledgment of parentage.

Except as otherwise provided in §§

15-8.1-307

and

15-8.1-308

, a valid denial of parentage under §

15-8.1-303

, filed with the department of vital records, in conjunction with a valid acknowledgment of parentage under §

15-8.1-301

, is equivalent to an adjudication of the nonparentage of the presumed parent or alleged genetic parent and discharges the presumed parent or alleged genetic parent from all rights and duties of a parent.

A signatory of an acknowledgment of parentage may rescind or challenge the acknowledgment in accordance with §§

15-8.1-307

through

15-8.1-309

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-306.
Waiver of filing fee.

If an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage is filed at a hospital, contemporaneously with birth, the department of health shall not charge a filing fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-307.
Timing of rescission.

A signatory may rescind an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage under this chapter by commencing a court proceeding before the earlier of:

Sixty (60) days after the effective date of the acknowledgment or denial, as provided in §

15-8.1-304

; or

The date of the first hearing before a court in a proceeding, to which the signatory is a party, to adjudicate an issue relating to the child, including a proceeding that establishes child support.

If an acknowledgment of parentage is rescinded under this section, any associated denial of parentage becomes invalid, and the department of human services shall notify:

The individual who gave birth to the child;

Any individual who signed a denial of parentage of the child; and

The department of vital records that the acknowledgment of parentage has been rescinded. Failure to provide notice as required by this section does not affect the validity of the rescission.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-308.
Challenge to acknowledgment after expiration of period for rescission.

After the period for rescission under §

15-8.1-307

has expired, a signatory of an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage may commence a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment or denial only:

On the basis of fraud, duress, coercion, threat of harm, or material mistake of fact; and

Within two (2) years after the acknowledgment or denial is effective in accordance with §

15-8.1-304

.

If an acknowledgment of parentage has been made in accordance with this chapter, an individual who is neither the child nor a signatory to the acknowledgment who seeks to challenge the validity of the acknowledgment and adjudicate parentage shall commence a proceeding within two (2) years after the effective date of the acknowledgment unless the individual did not know and could not reasonably have known of the individual’s potential parentage due to a material misrepresentation or concealment, in which case the proceeding shall be commenced within two (2) years after the discovery of the individual’s potential parentage. An individual under this section who seeks to challenge the validity of an acknowledgment and adjudicate parentage must have standing under §

15-8.1-105

. The court may permit the proceeding only if the court finds that the proceeding is in the best interests of the child. If the court permits the proceeding, the court shall adjudicate parentage under §

15-8.1-206

.

An individual challenging an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage pursuant to this section has the burden of proof by clear and convincing evidence.

A court proceeding in which the validity of an acknowledgment of parentage is challenged shall be consolidated with any other pending court actions regarding the child.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-309.
Procedure for rescission or challenge.

Every signatory to an acknowledgment of parentage and any related denial of parentage shall be made a party to a proceeding to judicially rescind an acknowledgment under §

15-8.1-307(a)

or a challenge to the acknowledgment or denial under §

15-8.1-308

.

For the purposes of a judicial rescission under §

15-8.1-307(a)

or a challenge to an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage under §

15-8.1-308

, a signatory submits to personal jurisdiction of this state by signing the acknowledgment or denial, effective upon the filing of the document with the department of vital records pursuant to §

15-8.1-304

.

Except for good cause shown, during the pendency of a proceeding to judicially rescind under §

15-8.1-307(a)

or challenge an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage under §

15-8.1-308

, the court shall not suspend the legal responsibilities of a signatory arising from the acknowledgment, including the duty to pay child support.

A proceeding to challenge an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage under §

15-8.1-308

shall be conducted as a proceeding to adjudicate parentage pursuant to article 1 of this chapter.

At the conclusion of a proceeding to rescind or challenge an acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage, the court shall order the department of vital records to amend the birth record of the child, if appropriate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-310.
Forms for acknowledgment and denial of parentage.

The department of vital records shall develop an acknowledgment of parentage form and denial of parentage form for execution of parentage under this chapter.

The acknowledgment of parentage form shall provide notice of the alternatives to, the legal consequences of, and the rights and responsibilities that arise from signing the acknowledgment and shall state that:

There is no other presumed parent of the child or, if there is another presumed parent, shall state that parent’s full name;

There is no other acknowledged parent, adjudicated parent, or individual who is an intended parent under articles 7 or 8 of this chapter other than the individual who gave birth to the child; and

The signatories understand that the acknowledgment is the equivalent of a court adjudication of parentage of the child and that a challenge to the acknowledgment is permitted only under limited circumstances.

A valid acknowledgment of parentage or denial of parentage is not affected by a later modification of the prescribed form.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-311.
Release of information.

The department of health may release information relating to an acknowledgment of parentage under §

15-8.1-301

, as set forth in §

23-3-23

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-312.
Adoption of rules.

The department of health shall promulgate rules and regulation to implement this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.